Massachusetts, session 194th, S2315.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be a
special commission to investigate and study the use of so-called double poles. The commission
shall consider identifying how many double poles exist and the length of time each has been in
place, the reason why such double poles have been in place for such time, and the process and
timeline by which existing utility poles are removed following the transfer of attached services to
a new pole. The commission shall also consider and may make recommendations on how best to
enforce the provisions of Section 34B of Chapter 164 of the General Laws concerning the timely
removal of double poles, investigate whether the current timeline for removing such poles is
reasonable and adequate, investigate how to address barriers to remove such poles, investigate
increasing utilization, improving functionality of attachment management systems (e.g., the
National Joint Utilities Notification System (NJUNS), and identifying solutions to resolve
communication issues among all parties, unlicensed attachments on utility poles and
requirements that providers promptly register such attachments, the legal liability and potential
of 2

use of indemnification agreements to facilitate the removal of abandoned attachments, whether
or not certain costs may be recovered from ratepayers, and the promulgation of regulations by
the Department of Public Utilities and Department of Telecommunications and Cable to
effectively regulate double utility poles.
The commission shall consist of 17 members: 1 of whom shall be the secretary of
administration and finance, or the secretary’s designee; 1 of whom shall be the chair of the
department of public utilities, or the chair's designee; 1 of whom shall be the commissioner of
the department of telecommunications and cable, or the commissioner’s designee; 1 of whom
shall be a representative of a municipal light board of commissioners or their designee; the house
and senate chairs of the joint committee on municipalities and regional government; 2 members
of the house of representatives, 1 of whom shall be appointed by the minority leader; 2 members
of the senate, 1 of whom shall be appointed by the minority leader; 3 municipal officials selected
by the governor, 1 utility pole owner; 1 utility pole attacher; the executive director of the
Massachusetts Municipal Association or their designee; and 1 private citizen, appointed by the
governor, who shall serve as chair of the commission and shall not be an employee of any
electric or telecommunications utility operating in the commonwealth.
The commission shall file a report of its recommendations and proposed legislation, if
any, with the clerks of the house and senate, the chairs of the house and senate committee on
ways and means and the chairs of the joint committee on municipalities and regional government
not later than June 30, 2026.
of 2